Utah statutes.
72-10-211.   Police regulations.
The division and a county, municipality, or airport authority acquiring,
establishing, developing, operating, maintaining, or controlling airports
outside the geographical limits of the subdivisions, under this chapter may
amend and enforce police regulations for the airports.
